District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.07

Determination of controlling child-support order.

(a)

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and only one tribunal has issued a child-support order, the order of that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

(b)

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter, and 2 or more child-support orders have been issued by tribunals of the District or another state with regard to the same obligor and same child, a tribunal of the District having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules and by order shall determine which order controls:

(1)

If only one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

(2)

If more than one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter:

(A)

An order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls; or

(B)

If an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls.

(3)

If none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the tribunal of the District shall issue a child-support order, which controls.

(c)

If 2 or more child-support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of the District having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under subsection (b) of this section. The request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or registration for modification pursuant to subchapter VI of this chapter, or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

(d)

A request to determine which is the controlling order must be accompanied by a copy of every child-support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

(e)

The tribunal that issued the controlling order under subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in § 46-302.05 or § 46-302.06.

(f)

A tribunal of the District that determines by order which is the controlling order under subsection (b)(1) or (2) or (c) of this section, or that issues a new controlling order under subsection (b)(3) of this section, shall state in that order:

(1)

The basis upon which the tribunal made its determination;

(2)

The amount of prospective support, if any; and

(3)

The total amount of consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are credited as provided by § 46-302.09.

(g)

Within 30 days after issuance of an order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining the order shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal that issued or registered an earlier order of child support. A party or support enforcement agency obtaining the order that fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the controlling order.

(h)

An order that has been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and interest, if any, made pursuant to this section must be recognized in proceedings under this chapter.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 207, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(c), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(B), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-306.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-342.7.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 207 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).